Massachusetts, session 194th, H3377.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 15 of Chapter 36 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking the words “micrographic process”; and further,
By inserting after the word “entered” the words: - “in a format approved by the
Secretary of the Commonwealth.”
of 1